Tennessee, session 114, SB1903.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-36-820(a)(7)(A), is amended by
inserting the language ", in writing," immediately after the language "Notify".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1903
011879
- 1 -